District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.09

Housing Assistance Fund.

The Housing Assistance Fund established by § 42-3403.07 [repealed] shall be administered and managed by the Office of the Tenant Advocate.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2068a
as added Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(g), 53 DCR 6703
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”